Maine, session 132, LD1410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 33 MRSA c. 47 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 47
PERSONAL PROPERTY OF PERSONS WITHOUT A HOME
§2301. Confiscation or destruction of personal property of person without home
1. Confiscation or destruction of personal property. The State or a state agency,
county, municipal corporation, school district, law enforcement agency or other public
corporation or political subdivision of the State may not confiscate or destroy the personal
property of a person without a home unless:
A. The personal property is found on public property;
B. The person without a home is notified no later than 7 calendar days in advance of
the proposed confiscation or destruction; and
C. The person without a home is offered the opportunity to attend a hearing to be heard
on the proposed confiscation or destruction, with the hearing to be conducted as if it
were an adjudicatory proceeding pursuant to Title 5, sections 9051 to 9064.
2. Storage of personal property. If a person without a home does not attend a hearing
under subsection 1, the person's personal property must be stored at a secure location for
no less than 90 calendar days and notice must be provided to the person of the address of
the location and the procedure for retrieving the personal property.
3. Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, the personal property of a person
without a home may be confiscated or destroyed if there is an objectively reasonable belief
that the property is abandoned, presents an immediate threat to public health or safety or is
evidence of a crime or contraband.
4. Enforcement. The following provisions govern enforcement of this section.
A. A person without a home who has had that person's personal property confiscated
or destroyed in violation of this section may bring an action in Superior Court for
damages of up to $2,000 for each piece of personal property confiscated or destroyed
and reasonable attorney's fees.
B. A person injured by a violation of this section may bring an action for injunctive
relief to enjoin confiscation or destruction of personal property. If a party seeking an
injunction prevails, the defendant is liable to pay the cost of suit, including reasonable
attorney's fees.